src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BÁRNEP !!= @CODE@ bárnep:bárnebu-. Comparisation of nouns. No -ahtá abesive.
        +N+Cmp/SgGen:bu%>       R                ;
        +N+Cmp/PlGen:bu%>j      R                ;
        +N+Cmp/SgNom:p%>        R                ;
           +N+Sg+Nom:p%>        K                ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:bu%>       K                ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:bu%>v      K                ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:bu%>j      K                ; ! Px ?? !!
           +N+Sg+Ine:bu%>n      K                ;
           +N+Sg+Ela:bu%>s      K                ;
           +N+Sg+Com:bu%>jn     K                ;
  +N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:bu%>jna    K                ; !
           +N+Pl+Nom:bu%>       K                ;
           +N+Pl+Gen:bu%>j      K                ;
           +N+Pl+Acc:bu%>jt     K                ;
           +N+Pl+Ill:bu%>jda    K                ;
           +N+Pl+Ine:bu%>jn     K                ;
           +N+Pl+Ela:bu%>js     K                ;
           +N+Pl+Com:bu%>j      K                ;
!             +N+Ess:n%>        K                ;
              +N+Ess:bu%>n      K                ;
           +N+Sg+Abe:bu%>#dagi  K                ;
           +N+Sg+Abe:bu%>#dagá  K                ;
  +Err/Orth+N+Sg+Abe:bu%>#tagá  K                ;
           +N+Pl+Abe:bu%>j#dagi K                ;
           +N+Pl+Abe:bu%>j#dagá K                ;
  +Err/Orth+N+Pl+Abe:bu%>j#tagá K                ;
!          +N+Sg+Nom:b%>        PxC              ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Gen:b%>        PxC              ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Acc:b%>        PxC              ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Ill:bu%>s%>    PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Ine:bu%>n%>    PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Ela:bu%>st%>   PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Com:bu%>jn%>   PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Gen:bu%>j%>    PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Acc:bu%>jd%>   PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Ill:bu%>jdas%> PxC              ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Ine:bu%>jn%>   PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Ela:bu%>jst%>  PxCs             ; !^P^
!          +N+Pl+Com:bu%>j%>    PxCs             ; !^P^
!                 +N:bu»g       DenominalAdjsODD ; ! Derived nouns don't get this
!+N+Abe:bu%>dak K ; Not for odd-syllable stems
!             +N+Abe:bu%>da     K                ;


!!€gt-norm: iednep # Odd-syllable test
!!€ iednep:            iednep+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ iednebuv:          iednep+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON OAPPÁSJ !!= @CODE@  Like GAHPER, but for derived nouns in diminutive, have an underived form. Doesn't get abesive -ahtá or -ahtes derivation. Oddsyll, no cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Has only one dimin derivation since these words already are dimin, ie. not double dim as in GAHPER.
           +N:%> N-ODDCASE             ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as gahper has no short Ess
           +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE           ;
           +N:»  DenominalNounsOAPPÁSJ ; !Gives only one extra diminutive derivation, not triple "oappátjattjasj"
           +N:%> ODDCmp                ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%> R                     ;

!!€gt-norm: stiebil # Odd-syllable test
!!€ oappásj:            oappásj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ oappátjis:          oappásj+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON FIERUN !!= @CODE@  Like GAHPER, but instruments derived from verbs. Fierrot>fierun. No short essive.
           +N:%> N-ODDCASE         ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as gahper has no short Ess
           +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           +N:»  DenominalNounsODD ;
           +N:»  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           +N:%> ODDCmp            ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%> R                 ;
           +N:   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: stiebil # Odd-syllable test
!!€ fierun:            fierun+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ fierunis:          fierun+N+Sg+Ela


!! !Plural odd-syll
! --------
