src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin
boadnjásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:boadnjátj OAPPÁSJ ;
áhkásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
LEXICON NounPx
adnembagádusásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Semcon:adnem#bagádusátj OAPPÁSJ ;
bagádusásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Semcon:bagádusátj OAPPÁSJ ;
bastisj+Sem/Obj:bastitj OAPPÁSJ ;
bielljegætjásj+Sem/Body:biellje#gætjátj OAPPÁSJ ;
biestarástásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:biesta#rástátj OAPPÁSJ ;
bitjun+Sem/Tool-music:bitjun FIERUN ;
bivtasbåtjån+Sem/Dummytag:bivtas#båtjån FIERUN ;
boaksarabán+Sem/Obj:boaksa#rabán FIERUN ;
bádneskuorun+Sem/Obj:bádne#skuorun FIERUN ;
bádnesålun+Sem/Obj:bádne#sålun FIERUN ;
báhtjasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:báhtjatj OAPPÁSJ ;
bálkun+Sem/Tool:bálkun FIERUN ;
bárnep+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:bárne BÁRNEP ;
báttásj+Sem/Dummytag:báttátj OAPPÁSJ ;
bávtjan+Sem/Obj:bávtjan FIERUN ;
båhtålrabán+Sem/Obj:båhtål#rabán FIERUN ;
bårkun+Sem/Obj-el:bårkun FIERUN ;
båsun+Sem/Tool-music:båsun FIERUN ;
båttåsj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:båttåtj OAPPÁSJ ;
bæhkásj+Sem/Part:bæhkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
bæjvásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Wthr:bæjvátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
dahpan+Sem/Dummytag:dahpan FIERUN ;
dubmanjamán+Sem/Dummytag:dubma#njamán FIERUN ;
dubmerubán+Sem/Obj-el:dubme#rubán FIERUN ;
duogásj+Sem/Feat:duogátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
duolman+Sem/Obj:duolman FIERUN ;
duolmun+Sem/Dummytag:duolmun FIERUN ;
duostun+Sem/Obj:duostun FIERUN ;
dållåhåjgån+Sem/Dummytag:dållå#håjgån FIERUN ;
dållåruson+Sem/Obj:dållå#ruson FIERUN ;
dållårusun+Sem/Obj:dållå#rusun FIERUN ;
dårjun+Sem/Obj:dårjun FIERUN ;
elmihtun+Sem/Tool-music:el#mihtun FIERUN ; ! Instrument
fierun+Sem/Obj:fierun FIERUN ;
fuorkásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:fuorkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
galmán+Sem/Ctain:galmán FIERUN ;
gatsun+Sem/Obj:gatsun FIERUN ;
gedasj+Sem/Body:gedatj OAPPÁSJ ;
gesun+Sem/Clth-jewl_Obj:gesun FIERUN ;
gieddetjuohpan+Sem/Obj-el:giedde#tjuohpan FIERUN ;
girddásj+Err/Orth+Sem/Veh:girdátj OAPPÁSJ ;
girddásj+Sem/Veh:girddátj OAPPÁSJ ;
girjásj+Sem/Txt:girjátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
guorásj+Sem/Build:guorátj OAPPÁSJ ;
gåjvun+Sem/Ctain:gåjvun FIERUN ; ! 
gålgun+Sem/Dummytag:gålgun FIERUN ;
gåtsan+Sem/Obj-el:gåtsan FIERUN ;
gåvån+Sem/Dummytag:gåvån FIERUN ;
gærgásj+Sem/Obj:gærgátj OAPPÁSJ ;
gætjásj+Sem/Part:gætjátj OAPPÁSJ ;
gættásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:gættátj OAPPÁSJ ;
háhppudakgåvån+Sem/Obj-el:háhppudak#gåvån FIERUN ;
iednep+Sem/Dummytag:iedne BÁRNEP ;
jávrásj+Sem/Plc:jávrátj OAPPÁSJ ;
jådån+Sem/Dummytag:jådån FIERUN ;
jågåsj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:jågåtj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
jåhttelåttåsj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:jåhtte#låttåtj OAPPÁSJ ;
jårun+Sem/Obj:jårun FIERUN ;
jækkásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:jækkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
lájbásj+Sem/Dummytag:lájbátj OAPPÁSJ ;
lávkásj+Sem/Dummytag:lávkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
låbdun+Sem/Dummytag:låbdun FIERUN ;
låptun+Sem/Ctain:låptun FIERUN ;
låttåsj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:låttåtj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
mihtun+Sem/Dummytag:mihtun FIERUN ;
moarssenejtsusj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:moarsse#nejtsutj OAPPÁSJ ;
muohtabálkun+Sem/Dummytag:muohta#bálkun FIERUN ;
muohtagåjvun+Sem/Dummytag:muohta#gåjvun FIERUN ;
muohtasálan+Sem/Dummytag:muohta#sálan FIERUN ;
muohtavuoján+Sem/Veh:muohta#vuoján FIERUN ;
mánásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:mánátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
målsun+Sem/Obj-el:målsun FIERUN ; ! GG
månnevuossjan+Sem/Dummytag:månne#vuossjan FIERUN ;
nejtsusj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:nejtsutj OAPPÁSJ ;
niejdap+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:niejda BÁRNEP ;
niejdasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:niejdatj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
njamun+Sem/Dummytag:njamun FIERUN ;
njuvdán+Sem/Dummytag:njuvdán FIERUN ;
njáman+Sem/Dummytag:njáman FIERUN ;
návlásj+Sem/Dummytag:návlátj OAPPÁSJ ;
nålån+Sem/Obj:nålån FIERUN ; ! GG
næhttalågån+Sem/Dummytag:næhtta#lågån FIERUN ;
oappásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oappátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
páhperbæhkásj+Sem/Obj:páhper#bæhkátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! LOAN
rabán+Sem/Dummytag:rabán FIERUN ;
rievsaktsitsásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rievsak#tsitsátj OAPPÁSJ ;
rissásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rissátj OAPPÁSJ ;
rubán+Sem/Dummytag:rubán FIERUN ;
ruovdásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Mat_Plc:ruovdátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
rábun+Sem/Dummytag:rábun FIERUN ;
rájgun+Sem/Dummytag:rájgun FIERUN ;
råhkålvisgirjásj+Sem/Dummytag:råhkålvis#girjátj OAPPÁSJ ;
råhtåsj+Sem/Dummytag:råhtåtj OAPPÁSJ ;
rægán+Sem/Dummytag:rægán FIERUN ;
sihkun+Sem/Dummytag:sihkun FIERUN ;
sjilásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjilátj OAPPÁSJ ;
sjuohpan+Sem/Dummytag:sjuohpan FIERUN ;
sjáhtjamvuoján+Sem/Tool:sjáhtjam#vuoján FIERUN ; ! 
skoalkán+Sem/Dummytag:skoalkán FIERUN ;
skuolkan+Sem/Dummytag:skuolkan FIERUN ;
slergun+Sem/Obj-el:slergun FIERUN ;
snjurgun+v1+Sem/Tool-music:snjurgun FIERUN ; ! 
snjurgun+v2+Sem/Tool-music:sjnjurgun FIERUN ; ! 
soagásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Dummytag:soagátj OAPPÁSJ ;
spettjun+Sem/Dummytag:spettjun FIERUN ;
statidjasj+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:statidjatj OAPPÁSJ ;
stågan+Sem/Ani_Hum:stågan FIERUN ; ! 
suohkun+Sem/Obj:suohkun FIERUN ;
suoján+Sem/Dummytag:suoján FIERUN ;
suollusj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:suollutj OAPPÁSJ ;
suorekgåjvun+Sem/Dummytag:suorek#gåjvun FIERUN ;
suovvabitjun+Sem/Dummytag:suovva#bitjun FIERUN ;
sviellanjamán+Sem/Dummytag:sviellan#jamán FIERUN ;
sákkásj+Sem/Dummytag:sákkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
sálan+Sem/Dummytag:sálan FIERUN ;
telefåvnnåduostun+Sem/Dummytag:telefåvnnå#duostun FIERUN ;
tiebmágirjásj+Sem/Txt:tiebmá#girjátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
timbardåbåsj+Sem/Dummytag:timbar#dåbåtj OAPPÁSJ ;
tjalman+Sem/Dummytag:tjalman FIERUN ;
tjiehtjerasj+Sem/Dummytag:tjiehtjeradtj OAPPÁSJ ;
tjiesskislánjásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Dummytag:tjiesskis#lánjátj OAPPÁSJ ;
tjievtjan+Sem/Veh:tjievtjan FIERUN ;
tjihtan+Sem/Ctain:tjihtan FIERUN ; ! What? Is this just a typo of tjihtán? Korhonen tjihtán, Kintek tjihtan
tjihtán+Sem/Dummytag:tjihtán FIERUN ;
tjullusj+Sem/Dummytag:tjullutj OAPPÁSJ ;
tjuohpan+Sem/Tool:tjuohpan FIERUN ; ! 
tjuolun+Sem/Dummytag:tjuolun FIERUN ;
tjáhtjerisjun+Sem/Obj:tjáhtje#risjun FIERUN ;
tjáhtjevuossjan+Sem/Obj-el:tjáhtje#vuossjan FIERUN ;
tjájnásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjájnátj OAPPÁSJ ;
tjálan+Sem/Dummytag:tjálan FIERUN ;
tsibrun+Sem/Dummytag:tsibrun FIERUN ;
tsirgun+Sem/Dummytag:tsirgun FIERUN ;
tsitsásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:tsitsátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
tsoavttsoáhkásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:tsoavttso#áhkátj OAPPÁSJ ;
tsåhkesvatján+Sem/Obj-el:tsåhke#svatján FIERUN ;
unnabastisj+Sem/Tool:unna#bastitj OAPPÁSJ ;
uvsasj+Sem/Dummytag:uvsatj OAPPÁSJ ;
vaskun+Sem/Dummytag:vaskun FIERUN ;
vieljap+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vielja BÁRNEP ;
vieljasj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vieljatj OAPPÁSJ ;
vierrajådån+Sem/Dummytag:vierra#jådån FIERUN ;
vuodtjajådån+Sem/Dummytag:vuodtja#jådån FIERUN ;
vuopptagátjun+Sem/Dummytag:vuoppta#gátjun FIERUN ;
várásj+Sem/Dummytag:várátj OAPPÁSJ ;
væjttalájbásj+Sem/Dummytag:væjtta#lájbátj OAPPÁSJ ;
áhkusj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhkutj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
áhtjep+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:áhtje BÁRNEP ;
ædnásj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body:ædnátj OAPPÁSJ ; ! 
